Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.135

Verification of licenses and registration—Notice to federal government.

(1) At least once every twelve months, the department of licensing shall obtain a list of dealers licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a) with business premises in the state of Washington from the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms. The department of licensing shall verify that all dealers on the list provided by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms are licensed and registered as required by RCW 9.41.100.

(2) At least once every twelve months, the department of licensing shall obtain from the department of revenue and the department of revenue shall transmit to the department of licensing a list of dealers registered with the department of revenue, and a list of dealers whose names and addresses were forwarded to the department of revenue by the department of licensing under RCW 9.41.110, who failed to register with the department of revenue as required by RCW 9.41.100.

(3) At least once every twelve months, the department of licensing shall notify the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms of all dealers licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a) with business premises in the state of Washington who have not complied with the licensing or registration requirements of RCW 9.41.100. In notifying the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms, the department of licensing shall not specify whether a particular dealer has failed to comply with licensing requirements or has failed to comply with registration requirements.

[ 1995 c 318 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 418.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 318: See note following RCW 82.04.030.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.